Wyoming statutes. Title 18 Counties
Article 1. County Boundaries
Johnson county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the center of section twenty-nine (29), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section five (5), township forty-four (44) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township forty-five (45) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north along the section lines to the northeast corner of section five (5), township forty-eight (48) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township forty-nine (49) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section five (5), township fifty-two (52) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north to the south one-quarter corner of section sixteen (16), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence west along section lines to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north along the range line to the southeast corner of section thirteen (13), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west along section lines to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south two (2) degrees thirty (30) minutes east along the west line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west, to the southeast corner of section thirteen (13), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-eight (78) west; thence west along section lines through township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-eight (78) west and township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence south along the west line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west to the southeast corner of section thirteen (13), township fifty-three (53) north, range eighty (80) west; thence west along section lines to the summit of the divide between the drainage of the Big Horn River and the drainage of streams running easterly from the Big Horn Mountains; thence southeasterly and southerly along said summit and divide to its intersection with the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west, in township fifty (50) north, being in the vicinity of Mather Peak; thence south on said range line to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-nine (49) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence east on the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-eight (48) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence south on the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-five (45) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence east along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-four (44) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence south along the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west, to the west one-quarter corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-five (85) west; thence east through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the point of beginning.

Laramie county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the southeast corner of the state of Wyoming; thence north to a point on the east boundary line of the state of Wyoming where the township line between townships eighteen (18) and nineteen (19) north, intersect said boundary; thence west along said township line to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township nineteen (19) north, range sixty-five (65) west; thence north along section lines to the northwest corner of section three (3), township nineteen (19) north, range sixty-five (65) west; thence west along the township line to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township nineteen (19) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-one (31), township seventeen (17) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township sixteen (16) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirteen (13) north, range seventy (70) west; thence along the third (3rd) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twelve (12) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence east along the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming to the southeast corner of said state, which is the point of beginning.

Lincoln county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the north one-quarter corner of section three (3), township eighteen (18) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence west along the township line between townships eighteen (18) and nineteen (19) north to the intersection of the said township line with the western boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence north along said western boundary of the state of Wyoming to the intersection of said boundary with the township line between township thirty-eight (38) north and township thirty-nine (39) north; thence east along the township line between township thirty-eight (38) and thirty-nine (39) north to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one hundred eighteen (118) west; thence south along the range line to the southwest corner of section thirty (30), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one hundred seventeen (117) west; thence east along the section lines to the southeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one hundred seventeen (117) west unsurveyed; thence south to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one hundred sixteen (116) west (unsurveyed); thence east six (6) miles to the southwest corner of section nineteen (19), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence east along section lines to the southeast corner of section twenty-four (24), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred fourteen (114) and one hundred fifteen (115) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirty-seven (37) north, range one hundred fourteen (114) west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section four (4) township thirty-six (36) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-six (36) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section four (4), township thirty-five (35) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-three (33) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence west along the township line between townships thirty-three (33) and thirty-two (32) north to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirty-three (33) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence due south to a point on the projection of the township line between townships thirty-one (31) and thirty-two (32) north; thence east along said projected township line to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-one (31) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred fifteen (115) and one hundred sixteen (116) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence along the township line between townships twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred fifteen (115) and one hundred sixteen (116) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-seven (27) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence east along the township line between townships twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27) north to the northeast corner of section five (5), township twenty-six (26) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32), township twenty-five (25) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-one (21) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section three (3), township twenty (20) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the point of beginning.

Natrona county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty-nine (29) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township thirty-two (32) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the eighth (8th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section three (3), township thirty-six (36) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the ninth (9th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-seven (37) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section three (3), township forty (40) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-five (35), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence north to the center of section twenty-six (26), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the west one-quarter corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-five (85) west; thence along the range line between ranges eighty-five (85) and eighty-six (86) west, to the northeast corner of section twenty-five (25), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-six (86) west; thence west along section lines to the northwest corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-one (41) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section three (3), township forty (40) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-seven (37) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the ninth (9th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section three (3), township thirty-six (36) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the eighth (8th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-two (32) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence east along the seventh (7th) standard parallel to the point of beginning.

The eastern boundary of Natrona county, Wyoming, and the western boundary of Converse county, Wyoming, is hereby fixed, established and determined to be as follows, to-wit: beginning at the center of section twenty-six (26), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-five (35), township forty-one (41) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the tenth (10th) standard parallel to the northeast corner of section three (3), township forty (40) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-seven (37) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence along the ninth (9th) standard parallel to the north one-quarter corner of section three (3), township thirty-six (36) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south on centerline of section thirty-four (34) to the southwest corner of lot one (1), section thirty-four (34), thence west on the north line of tract forty-four (44), section thirty-four (34) to the northwest corner thereof, thence south on the west line of tract forty-four (44), section thirty-four (34), township thirty-three (33) north, range seventy-seven (77) west, to the southwest corner thereof; thence south along the east line of lots eleven (11), thirteen (13), fourteen (14), eighteen (18) and tract fifty-two (52), section four (4), township thirty-two (32) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along the east line of tract fifty-two (52), lots three (3), four (4), six (6), and tract fifty-nine (59), section nine (9); thence south along the east line of tract fifty-nine (59) and lot three (3) to the southwest corner of tract fifty-eight (58), thence east on south line of tract fifty-eight (58) to the northwest corner of lot four (4), thence south on the east line of lot three (3), section sixteen (16); thence south along the east line of lots one (1), two (2), three (3), four (4), section twenty-one (21); thence south along the east line of lot four (4) to the point of intersection on the north boundary of lot “A”, tract seventy-eight (78), thence east along the north boundary of lot “A” to the northeast corner thereof, thence south along the east line of lot “A” to the southeast corner thereof, thence west along the south line of lot “A” to the southwest corner of lot “A,” tract seventy-eight (78); thence south along the west line of lots three (3), four (4), five (5), section twenty-eight (28); thence south on the west line of lot one (1), section thirty-three (33) to the northeast corner of tract ninety-seven (97) “B”, thence east along the north line of lot “A”, tract ninety-seven (97) to the northeast corner thereof, thence south on the east line of tract ninety-seven (97) to the southeast corner thereof, thence west on the south line of tract ninety-seven (97) to the east line of lot six (6), thence south on the east line of lot six (6) to the township line, all being in township thirty-two (32) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence west on the township line to the north one-quarter of section four (4), township thirty-one (31) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty-nine (29) north, range seventy-seven (77) west, in accordance with the original survey and resurvey plats on file in the public survey office of the United States general land office, Cheyenne, Wyoming.

Niobrara county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the west one-quarter corner of section twenty-seven (27), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty-seven (67) west; and running thence south along section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township thirty-one (31) north, range sixty-seven (67) west; thence east along the township line between townships thirty (30) and thirty-one (31) north, to its intersection with the eastern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence north along said eastern boundary line of the state of Wyoming to the point where said boundary intersects a line projected east from the west one-quarter corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty (60) west; thence west through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the place of beginning.

Park county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty-five (45) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence north along the east section lines of section thirty-three (33), twenty-eight (28), twenty-one (21), sixteen (16), nine (9), and four (4), to the northeast corner of section four (4), township forty-five (45) north, range one hundred two (102) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-five (45) and forty-six (46) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-six (46) north, range one hundred one (101) west; thence north along the range line between ranges one hundred (100) and one hundred one (101) west, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-seven (47) north, range one hundred one (101) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-six (46) and forty-seven (47) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-seven (47) north, range one hundred (100) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-nine (99) and one hundred (100) west to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-eight (48) north, range one hundred (100) west; thence east along the township line between townships forty-seven (47) and forty-eight (48) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-eight (48) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty-eight (48) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence along the twelfth (12th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township forty-nine (49) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township fifty-two (52) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence along the thirteenth (13th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-three (53) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the northeast corner of section one (1), township fifty-six (56) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence along the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township fifty-seven (57) north, range ninety-eight (98) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-seven (97) and ninety-eight (98) west to the intersection of said line with the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence west along the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming to the western boundary of said state of Wyoming; thence south along the western boundary of the state of Wyoming to parallel forty-four degrees (44) forty minutes (40´) of north latitude; thence east along said parallel of latitude to the one hundred ten degrees (110) forty minutes (40´) meridian of west longitude from Greenwich; thence south along said meridian to parallel forty-four degrees (44) thirty-five minutes (35´) of north latitude; thence east along said parallel to the middle of the main channel of the Yellowstone River; thence southerly following the centerline of the main channel of the Yellowstone River to the point where the Yellowstone River leaves Yellowstone Lake; thence southerly following the eastern shoreline of Yellowstone Lake to the mouth of Yellowstone River; thence southeasterly following the centerline of the main channel of the Yellowstone River to intersect the southern boundary of the Yellowstone National Park; thence east along the southern boundary of Yellowstone National Park to a point where said boundary intersects a line running north from the southwest corner of section thirty-four (34), township forty-five (45) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence south along said line to a point where it intersects the Continental Divide, separating the waters of the Missouri from the Columbia; thence south and southeasterly along said divide until said divide intersects the divide separating the waters flowing into Grey Bull River and tributaries, from the waters flowing into tributaries of Big Wind River; thence easterly and southeasterly along said divide between Wind River and tributaries, and the Grey Bull River and tributaries, until said divide intersects the eleventh (11th) standard parallel; thence east along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the point of beginning.

Platte county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the northeast corner of section six (6), township thirty (30) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range seventy (70) west; thence west along the township line to the northeast corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-five (25) north, range seventy (70) west; thence east along the township line to the northeast corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-one (21) north, range seventy (70) west; thence west along the township line to the north one-quarter corner of section six (6), township twenty (20) north, range seventy (70) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty (20) north, range seventy (70) west; thence east along the township line between townships twenty (20) and nineteen (19) north to the southeast corner of section thirty-three (33), township twenty (20) north, range sixty-five (65) west; thence north along the middle section line of range sixty-five (65) west to the northeast corner of section four (4), township thirty (30) north, range sixty-five (65) west; thence west along the township line to the place of beginning.

Sheridan county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the south one-quarter corner of section sixteen (16), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township fifty-six (56) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence along the fourteenth (14th) standard parallel to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township fifty-seven (57) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence west along the northern boundary of the state of Wyoming to its intersection with the divide between the tributaries of the Big Horn River and the streams flowing easterly from the Big Horn Mountains; thence southerly and southeasterly along said divide to its intersection with the line passing east and west through the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range eighty-seven (87) west; thence east along section lines to the west line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence north along the west line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west; thence east along section lines through township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-nine (79) west and township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-eight (78) west to the southeast corner of section thirteen (13), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-eight (78) west; thence north two (2) degrees thirty (30´) minutes west along the west line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence east along section lines through township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west to the east line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west; thence south along the east line of township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-seven (77) west to the southwest corner of section eighteen (18), township fifty-three (53) north, range seventy-six (76) west; thence east along the section lines to the point of beginning.

Sublette county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: beginning at the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-seven (27) north, range one hundred three (103) west; thence north along the range line between ranges one hundred two (102) and one hundred three (103) west, to the northeast corner of section one (1), township twenty-eight (28) north, range one hundred three (103) west; thence along the line between townships twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north, to the southeast corner of section thirty-six (36), township twenty-nine (29) north, range one hundred three (103) west; thence north along the range line between ranges one hundred two (102) and one hundred three (103) west, to the northeast corner of section one (1), township thirty-one (31) north, range one hundred three (103) west; thence west on the continuation of the township line between townships thirty-one and thirty-two (31 and 32) north, to the intersection of said range line with the divide between the Missouri River drainage and the Green River drainage; thence northwesterly along said divide to its intersection with the range line between ranges one hundred seven (107) and one hundred eight (108) west; thence north along said range line to the northeast corner of section one (1), township forty (40) north, range one hundred eight (108) west; thence west along the township line between townships forty (40) and forty-one (41) north, to the north one-quarter corner of section four (4), township forty (40) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence south through the one-quarter corners to the south one-quarter corner of section thirty-three (33), township forty (40) north, range one hundred ten (110) west; thence west along the township line between townships thirty-nine (39) and forty (40) north to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred twelve (112) and one hundred thirteen (113) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirty-nine (39) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence west to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-eight (38) north, range one hundred fourteen (114) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred fourteen (114) and one hundred fifteen (115) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirty-seven (37) north, range one hundred fourteen (114) west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section four (4), township thirty-six (36) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-six (36) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence west along the section lines to the northwest corner of section four (4), township thirty-five (35) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the section lines to the southwest corner of section thirty-three (33), township thirty-three (33) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence west along the line between townships thirty-three (33) and thirty-two (32) north to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirty-three (33) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence due south to a point on the projection of the township line between townships thirty-one (31) and thirty-two (32) north; thence east along said projected township line to the northwest corner of section six (6), township thirty-one (31) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the range line between ranges one hundred fifteen (115) and one hundred sixteen (116) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-nine (29) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence along the township lines between townships twenty-eight (28) and twenty-nine (29) north, to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-eight (28) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence south along the range line between range one hundred fifteen (115) and one hundred sixteen (116) west, to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-seven (27) north, range one hundred fifteen (115) west; thence east along the township line between townships twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27) north, to the point of beginning.

Sweetwater county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming, where the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west, intersects said southern boundary; thence north along said range line to the third (3rd) standard parallel; thence along the third (3rd) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township thirteen (13) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west to the fourth (4th) standard parallel; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township seventeen (17) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence north along the range line between ranges ninety-three (93) and ninety-four (94) west to the northwest corner of section six (6), township nineteen (19) north, range ninety-three (93) west; thence east along the township line between townships nineteen (19) and twenty (20) north to the southeast corner of section thirty-four (34), township twenty (20) north, range ninety (90) west; thence north along section lines to the northeast corner of section three (3), township twenty (20) north, range ninety (90) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-one (21) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-five (25) north, range eighty-nine (89) west; thence north along the range line between ranges eighty-nine (89) and ninety (90) west to the northwest corner of section six (6), township twenty-six (26) north, ranges eighty-nine (89) west; thence west along the township line between townships twenty-six (26) and twenty-seven (27) north, to the northeast corner of section five (5), township twenty-six (26) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence south along section lines to the southeast corner of section thirty-two (32) township twenty-five (25) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence along the sixth (6th) standard parallel to the north quarter-section corner of section six (6), township twenty-four (24) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through quarter-section corners to the south quarter-section corner of section thirty-one (31), township twenty-one (21) north, range one hundred eleven (111) west; thence along the fifth (5th) standard parallel to the north quarter-section corner of section three (3), township twenty (20) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through quarter-section corners to the south quarter-section corner of section thirty-four (34), township seventeen (17) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the north quarter-section corner of section four (4), resurvey township sixteen (16) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence south through the centers of sections and through quarter-section corners to a point on the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming, said point being where the centerline of section twenty-eight (28), resurvey township twelve (12) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west intersects said southern boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence east along the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming, to the point of beginning.

Uinta county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming at a point where the centerline of section twenty-eight (28), resurvey township twelve (12) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west, intersects said boundary of the state of Wyoming; thence north through the centers of sections and through quarter-section corners to the north quarter-section corner of section four (4), resurvey township sixteen (16) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence along the fourth (4th) standard parallel to the south quarter-section corner of section thirty-four (34), township seventeen (17) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence north through the centers of sections and through quarter-section corners to the north quarter-section corner of section three (3), township eighteen (18) north, range one hundred twelve (112) west; thence west along the township line between townships eighteen (18) and nineteen (19) north, to the point where the said township line intersects the western boundary line of the state of Wyoming; thence south along said western boundary of the state of Wyoming to the southwest corner of the state of Wyoming; thence east along the southern boundary of the state of Wyoming to the point of beginning.

Weston county is that portion of the state of Wyoming within the following boundaries: commencing at a point on the eastern boundary of the state of Wyoming where the same is intersected by a line projected east from the west one-quarter corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty (60) west; thence north along said eastern boundary of the state of Wyoming, to the point on said boundary where the same is intersected by the township line between townships forty-eight (48) and forty-nine (49) north; thence west along said township line to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-eight (48) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence south along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the southwest corner of section thirty-one (31), township forty-five (45) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence along the eleventh (11th) standard parallel to the northwest corner of section six (6), township forty-four (44) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence south along the range line between ranges sixty-eight (68) and sixty-nine (69) west to the west one-quarter corner of section thirty (30), township forty-one (41) north, range sixty-eight (68) west; thence east through centers of sections and through one-quarter corners to the point of beginning.

(v)
